Connecticut, session 2026, HB05111.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That chapter 219 of the general statutes be amended to (1) expand the
existing sales and use taxes exemption for personal property used in
burials or cremations to ten thousand dollars, and (2) exempt burial and
cremation services from the sales and use taxes.